District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.04

Purposes for corporate organization.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 267, Pub. L. 87-569, § 4
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-217, § 3(a), 46 DCR 284
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-4, § 3(a), 54 DCR 4085
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.04.
1981 Ed., § 29-504.
1973 Ed., § 29-1004.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Cooperative Association Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-265, April 25, 1997, law notification 43 DCR 4355).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Cooperative Association Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-483, January 13, 1997, 44 DCR 626), and see § 3(a) of the Cooperative Association Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-59, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2235).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Cooperative Association Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-203. December 2, 1997, 44 DCR 7498).